Utah statutes.
63G-2-105.   Confidentiality agreements.

If a governmental entity or political subdivision receives a request for a record that is subject to a confidentiality agreement executed before April 1, 1992, the law in effect at the time the agreement was executed, including late judicial interpretations of the law, shall govern access to the record, unless all parties to the confidentiality agreement agree in writing to be governed by the provisions of this chapter.

